Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1401 to 38-1432 shall be known and may be cited as the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 537;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 2.